Hawaii, session 2026, HB1609.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 109, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§109-    Stadium facility; naming rights; marketing; advertising.  (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, chapter 102 shall not apply to concessions within the stadium facility. (b) The stadium authority may lease the naming rights of the stadium facility or any portion of the stadium facility or building therein to any public or private entity. (c)  Any revenues derived from advertising or marketing in or on the stadium facility, including revenues derived under subsection (b), shall be deposited into the stadium development special fund under section 109-3.5." SECTION 2.  Chapter 201B, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§201B-    Convention center facility; naming rights; marketing; advertising.  (a)  Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, chapter 102 shall not apply to concessions in or on the convention center facility. (b)  The authority may lease the naming rights of the convention center facility or any portion of the convention center facility to any public or private entity. (c)  Any revenues derived from advertising or marketing in or on the convention center facility, including revenues derived under subsection (b), shall be deposited into the convention center enterprise special fund under section 201B-8." SECTION 3.  Section 109-3.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  There is established in the state treasury the stadium development special fund, into which funds collected by the stadium authority shall be deposited, including: (1)  All revenues from the stadium development district, including but not limited to [agreements]: (A)  Any agreement or [actions] action generating revenue related to stadium operations[,]; (B)  The lease or rental of facilities or land, [concessions,]; (C)  Advertising or marketing, including revenues derived under section 109-  ; (D)  Any concession; (E)  The food and beverage[,] service; (F)  The parking[, sponsorship] facilities; (G)  Sponsorship and advertising[, utilities and]; and (H)  Utilities, infrastructure, and development; (2)  All gifts or grants awarded in any form from any public agency or any other source for purposes of the stadium development district; (3)  All proceeds from revenue bonds issued for the purpose of the stadium development district; and (4)  Appropriations made by the legislature to the fund." SECTION 4.  Section 201B-8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) There is established the convention center enterprise special fund, into which shall be deposited: (1)  A portion of the revenues from the transient accommodations tax, as provided by section 237D-6.5; (2)  All revenues or moneys derived from the operations of the convention center to include all revenues from [the]: (A)  The food and beverage service[, all revenues from the]; (B)  The parking facilities [or from any]; (C)  Any concession[, and all revenues from the]; (D)  The sale of souvenirs, logo items, or any other items offered for purchase at the convention center; and (E)  Advertising or marketing, including revenues derived under section 201B-  ; (3)  Private contributions, interest, compensation, gross or net revenues, proceeds, or other moneys derived from any source or for any purpose arising from the use of the convention center facility; and (4)  Appropriations by the legislature for marketing the facility pursuant to section 201B-7(a)(7)." SECTION 5.  Section 445-112, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§445-112  Where and when permitted.  No person shall erect, maintain, or use a billboard or display any outdoor advertising device, except as provided in this section: (1)  The display of official notices and signs, posted by order of any court or public office, or posted by any public officer in the performance of a public duty, or posted by any person required to do so by any law or rule having the force of law; (2)  Any outdoor advertising device announcing a meeting or series of meetings is not prohibited by this section if displayed on the premises where the meeting or series of meetings will be or is being held. Meeting, as used in this section, includes all meetings regardless of whether open to the public or conducted for profit and includes but is not limited to sports events, conventions, fairs, rallies, plays, lectures, concerts, motion pictures, dances, and religious services; (3)  Any outdoor advertising device indicating that the building or premises on which it is displayed is the residence, office, or place of business, commercial or otherwise, of any individual, partnership, joint venture, association, club, or corporation, and stating the nature of the business; (4)  Any outdoor advertising device that advertises property or services that may be bought, rented, sold, or otherwise traded in on the premises or in the building on which the outdoor advertising device is displayed; (5)  The offering for sale of merchandise bearing incidental advertising, including books, magazines, and newspapers, in any store, newsstand, vending machine, rack, or other place where such merchandise is regularly sold; (6)  Any outdoor advertising device offering any land, building, or part of a building for sale or rent, if displayed on the property so offered or on the building so offered; (7)  Any outdoor advertising device carried by persons or placed upon vehicles used for the transportation of persons or goods, except as provided under section 445‑112.5, relating to vehicular advertising devices; (8)  Any outdoor advertising device warning the public of dangerous conditions that they may encounter in nearby sections of streets, roads, paths, public places, power lines, gas and water mains, or other public utilities; (9)  Signs serving no commercial purpose that indicate places of natural beauty, or of historical or cultural interest and that are made according to designs approved by the department of business, economic development, and tourism; (10)  Any outdoor advertising device or billboard erected, placed, or maintained upon a state office building, if erected, placed, or maintained by authority of a state agency, department, or officer for the sole purpose of announcing cultural or educational events within the State, and if the design and location thereof has been approved by the department of business, economic development, and tourism; (11)  Signs urging voters to vote for or against any person or issue, may be erected, maintained, and used, except where contrary to or prohibited by law; (12)  Signs stating that a residence that is offered for sale, lease, or rent is open for inspection at the actual time the sign is displayed and showing the route to the residence; provided that the sign contains no words or designs other than the words "Open House", the address of the residence, the name of the person or agency responsible for the sale, and an arrow or other directional symbol and is removed during such time as the residence is not open for inspection; (13)  The erection, maintenance, and use of billboards if the billboard is used solely for outdoor advertising devices not prohibited by this section; (14)  The continued display and maintenance of outdoor advertising devices actually displayed on July 8, 1965, in accordance with all laws and ordinances immediately theretofore in effect; (15)  The continued maintenance of any billboard actually maintained on July 8, 1965, and the display thereon of the same or new advertising devices, all in accordance with all laws and ordinances in effect immediately prior to July 9, 1965; (16)  Any outdoor advertising device, displayed with the authorization of the [University] university of Hawaii, on any scoreboard of any stadium owned by the university.  An outdoor advertising device displayed under this paragraph shall be on the front of the scoreboard and face the interior of the stadium; (17)  Any temporary outdoor advertising device attached to or supported by the structure of any stadium owned by the [University] university of Hawaii, located within and facing the interior of the stadium, and authorized to be displayed by the university.  For the purpose of this paragraph, "temporary" means displayed for a short period before the official start of organized athletic competition, during the organized athletic competition, and for a short period after the official end of the organized athletic competition; (18)  Any outdoor advertising device, displayed with the authorization of the stadium authority, on any scoreboard of any stadium operated by the stadium authority. An outdoor advertising device displayed under this paragraph shall be on the front of the scoreboard and face the interior of the stadium; [and] (19)  Any outdoor advertising device, displayed with the authorization of the stadium authority, on the exterior of any stadium operated by the stadium authority. Any outdoor advertising device displayed under this paragraph shall be limited to the name of any entity that leased the naming rights of the stadium from the stadium authority; and [(19)] (20) Any outdoor advertising device, displayed with the authorization of the city and county of Honolulu, on the scoreboard of the Waipio peninsula soccer stadium.  The outdoor advertising device shall be: (A)  Attached to the bottom of the scoreboard; (B)  No longer than the width of the scoreboard; and (C)  No higher than twenty-five per cent of the scoreboard height. The scoreboard shall be no larger than twenty-eight feet by ten feet.  Any outdoor advertising device displayed pursuant to this paragraph shall be on the front of the scoreboard and face the interior of the stadium; provided that the outdoor advertising device shall not be visible from any thoroughfare." SECTION 6.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 7.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________